Montana, session 2025, SB216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Short title. [Sections 1 through 5] may be cited as the "Montana
Physicians' Workforce Investment Act".

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Purpose. The purposes of [sections 1 through 5] are to address
Montana's physician workforce needs by:
(1) creating a graduate medical education task force; and
(2) establishing a start-up grant program to support the creation of graduate medical education
programs in the state.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 5], the following definitions
apply:
(1) "Graduate medical education" means residency and fellowship programs that provide
additional training after medical school that is required for medical graduates to obtain full medical licensure
and become eligible for specialty board certification.
(2) "Health sector facility" means a for-profit or nonprofit place of employment whose primary
function is the delivery of health care services.
(3) "Medical graduate" means a person who has graduated from a medical doctor program or
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 216

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0216.2
doctor of osteopathic medicine program but who has not yet completed a graduate medical education program.
(4) "Physician" has the same meaning as provided in 37-3-102.
(5) "Task force" means the Montana graduate medical education task force established in [section
4].

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Montana graduate medical education task force -- membership --
duties -- reporting. (1) There is a Montana graduate medical education task force. The task force consists of
12 SIX members:
(a) the director of the department of public health and human services or the director's designee;
(b) the commissioner of higher education or the commissioner's designee A DESIGNEE OF THE
COMMISSIONER WITH EXPERIENCE IN GRADUATE MEDICAL EDUCATION;
(C) THE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY OR A DESIGNEE OF THE DIRECTOR WITH
EXPERIENCE IN PHYSICIAN WORKFORCE ISSUES;
(c) (D) the following individuals appointed by the governor:
(i) a representative of the department of labor and industry with experience in physician
workforce issues;
(ii) (I) a representative of an organization that represents Montana physicians;
(iii) one representative from each of the three medical school programs in the state;
(iv) (II) two representatives ONE REPRESENTATIVE from a hospital or other health sector facility with a
graduate medical education program in the state; and
(v) (III) one patient advocate; and.
(d) two nonvoting members who are legislators:
(i) one house of representatives member selected by the speaker of the house; and
(ii) one senate member selected by the president of the senate.
(2) The task force shall elect a presiding officer and vice presiding officer.
(3) The task force shall develop and administer a grant program allowing Montana-based health
sector facilities to apply for a start-up grant to establish a graduate medical education program.
(4) By September 1 of each year, the task force shall submit an annual report to the governor, the
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 216

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0216.2
economic affairs interim committee, and the children, families, health, and human services interim committee in
accordance with 5-11-210. The report must include:
(a) a description of the task force's proceedings since the previous report;
(b) an itemized expenditure report; and
(c) details of the graduate medical education grant program established in [section 5], including:
(i) health sector facilities that received grants;
(ii) the number of graduate medical education programs established or in development;
(iii) the specialty and location of each graduate medical education program;
(iv) the number of positions for medical graduates created in each graduate medical education
program and how many of these positions were filled; and
(v) the accreditation status of each graduate medical education program.
(5) The department of labor and industry shall provide staff services to the task force.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Graduate medical education grant program -- eligibility. (1) (a)
There is a graduate medical education grant program administered by the Montana graduate medical education
task force established in [section 4]. The purpose of the program is to address a shortage of physicians in the
state by developing and expanding graduate medical education programs in the state.
(b) The task force shall develop policies and procedures to receive and evaluate applications and
to administer grant funding.
(2) An application for a grant under this program must include:
(a) the specialty area for each program;
(b) proof of program accreditation or steps to obtain accreditation;
(c) a 2-year financial cost projection for the program; and
(d) a 5-year sustainability plan to ensure the program remains operational after the grant ends.
(3) A recipient of a grant under this program shall:
(a) attest that the recipient provides equal consideration for placement within a grant-funded
graduate medical education program to applicants who:
(i) are graduates of medical doctor programs or doctor of osteopathic medicine programs; or
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 216

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0216.2
(ii) have passed the United States medical licensing examination or the comprehensive
osteopathic medical licensing examination; and
(b) submit the information prescribed in [section 4(4)] by July 30 of each year so the task force
may include it in the task force's required report.
(4) The maximum grant amount a recipient may receive is $2 million.

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Allocation. There is allocated to the department of labor and industry $6
million from the general fund for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for the graduate medical education grant
program provided for in [section 5].

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 5] are intended to be
codified as an integral part of Title 39, chapter 11, part 2, and the provisions of Title 39, chapter 11, part 2,
apply to [sections 1 through 5].

NEW SECTION. Section 8. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 216